Washington statutes.
RCW 10.98.150

Status reports on felons.

The section and the department shall provide prompt responses to the requests of law enforcement agencies and jails regarding the status of suspected or convicted felons. Dissemination of individual identities, criminal histories, or the whereabouts of a suspected or convicted felon shall be in accordance with chapter 10.97 RCW, the Washington state criminal records privacy act.

[ 1984 c 17 s 15.]